District of Columbia statutes.
35-406

Repealed

“Owner” defined.

Repealed.

June 29, 1938, ch. 809, § 6
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 954, Pub. L. 85-792,§ 2
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(a), 33 DCR 703
1973 Ed., § 44-306.
1981 Ed., § 44-306.